Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Part 6

Miscellaneous Provisions

35-6-601. Application and construction of chapter 6.

Section 35-15-1101 controls all application and construction of chapter 6.

Acts 2000, ch. 829, § 1; 2013, ch. 390, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act. (c) If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before such effective date, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

35-6-602. Application of act to existing trusts and estates.

This act applies to every trust or decedent's estate existing on or after July 1, 2000, except as otherwise expressly provided in the will or terms of the trust or in this act.

Acts 2000, ch. 829, § 1.